Hawaii statutes.
§46-15.5 Cooperation by state departments.
All state departments, including the departments of human services and health,
shall cooperate with the counties with respect to administrative inspections
conducted under section 46-15.4, by providing information:

(1) Regarding probable violations of the conditions
of a license under section 445-95;

(2) Regarding the probable operation of a lodging or
tenement house, group home, group residence, group living arrangement, hotel,
boardinghouse, or restaurant; or

(3) That may be used to satisfy the probable cause
requirement of section 46-15.4. [L 1987, c 333, pt of §1; am L 1989, c 261, §3]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next